Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2528
Death penalty cases; Supreme Court; orders.

In all cases when the death penalty has been imposed by the district court, the Supreme Court shall, after consideration of the appeal, order the prisoner to be discharged, a new trial to be had, or appoint a day certain for the execution of the sentence.

Laws 1973, LB 268, § 13;

Laws 1982, LB 722, § 12;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 35;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The repeal of section 29-2528 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 35, is not effective because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.